Texas statutes.
TRANSPORTATION CODE

TITLE 7. VEHICLES AND TRAFFIC

SUBTITLE C. RULES OF THE ROAD

CHAPTER 553. ENACTMENT AND ENFORCEMENT OF CERTAIN TRAFFIC LAWS IN CERTAIN MUNICIPALITIES

Sec. 553.001. APPLICABILITY. This chapter applies only to a municipality with a population of less than 2,500 in a county with a population of 250,000 or more.

Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Sec. 553.002. TRAFFIC SIGNALS OR SIGNS IN MUNICIPALITY. (a) A municipality may not enact an ordinance governing the erection or operation of a traffic signal or sign in the municipality on a state highway funded in whole or in part by the state without prior approval by the Texas Department of Transportation.

(b) A municipality intending to erect or operate a traffic signal or sign described by Subsection (a) must apply in writing to the Texas Department of Transportation. After the application is filed, the Texas Department of Transportation shall designate an employee to investigate the application and shall grant or refuse the application not later than the 90th day after the date of the designation.

(c) In granting an application, the Texas Department of Transportation:

(1) may prescribe the conditions under which the municipality may erect and operate the signal or sign and all other aspects of the signal or sign; and

(2) shall consider the convenience of the traveling public in raising speed limits in noncongested areas and the control of traffic for the protection of schoolchildren and other inhabitants of small communities where there are areas of congestion and cross-traffic.

(d) This section does not apply to an ordinance enacted or a temporary speed limit sign erected or operated under Section 545.3561.

Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 216 (H.B. 109), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2011.

Sec. 553.003. INJUNCTION AGAINST UNAUTHORIZED SIGNAL OR SIGN. (a) If a municipality erects or maintains a traffic signal or sign without meeting the requirements of this chapter, the district or county attorney of the county where the signal or sign is located shall bring a suit to enjoin the erection and maintenance of the signal or sign.

(b) If the district or county attorney does not institute a suit under Subsection (a) within 15 days after the date a request to do so is received from a resident of the state, any state resident may institute and prosecute the suit.

Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.